Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 14 Polling Place Regulations After Polls Close

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 299 to 302.

29 C.J.S. Elections § 317.

§ 22-14-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, defined “Precinct official.”

§ 22-14-102.
Who may be present after polls close; making pollbooks agree; counting votes.

After all the votes are cast and the polls are officially declared closed, only election judges shall be permitted in a polling place. When all ballots are cast, the machine shall be locked against further voting and sealed as prescribed by law. Except as otherwise provided by W.S. 22-14-114(b), election judges shall commence to count votes and shall continue without adjournment until counting is completed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-203; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2019 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2015 amendment,

deleted the former third sentence; and in the last sentence, deleted “When the pollbooks agree” at the beginning, and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added "Except as otherwise provided by W.S. 22-14-114(b)" to the last sentence.

§ 22-14-103.
Counting in paper ballot precincts; discrepancies.

Unless otherwise validated by a canvassing board pursuant to W.S.

22-13-105

, ballots not initialed by a judge of election or county clerk shall not be counted. If the number of ballots is not equal to the number of voters entered in the pollbook as having voted that ballot, the election judges shall attempt to determine the discrepancy. If the election judges cannot determine the discrepancy, the county clerk and, if necessary, the county canvassing board, shall resolve the discrepancy.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-204; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted the former first sentence, which read: “Folded paper ballots and punch card ballots shall be counted as soon as the ballot box is opened,” deleted “marked with the official rubber stamp or not” following “Ballots not,” and substituted “or county clerk” for “or found so folded as to bear the appearance of having been voted by one (1) person.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added “Unless otherwise validated by a canvassing board pursuant to W.S.

22-13-105

” at the beginning.

§ 22-14-104.
Entry of paper ballot votes.

Paper ballots shall be opened by the counting board and every vote for a candidate or ballot proposition shall be entered on a list. A vote which is not clearly marked shall not be tallied for that office or question but votes clearly marked on the remainder of the ballot shall be tallied.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-205; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2013 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “shall be”, deleted “tally” in the first sentence, substituted the period at the end of the first sentence for “by a vertical mark, except that every fifth mark shall diagonally cross the preceding four (4).
The counting board may determine the order of tallying candidates and ballot propositions.”, and deleted the last sentence “Ballots contained in separate ballot boxes shall be counted and tallied separately.”

§ 22-14-105.
Vote tallying in voting machine polling places.

In voting machine polling places, the judges of election shall cast all remaining absentee ballots on a voting machine in the manner prescribed by W.S.

22-9-121

and shall lock and seal the voting machines. They shall certify in writing that the machine was locked and sealed, stating the time, the number of voters voting on each machine as shown on the public counters, the number on the seal, and the number registered on the protective counter.

Election judges shall then determine the number of votes cast on each voting machine used in the polling place by opening the machine or obtaining a photographic or mechanical printed return sheet from the machine.

After the voting machine is opened or the printed return sheet obtained, an election judge or counting board member shall read and clearly announce the designating number or letter on each counter for each candidate or ballot proposition and the results shown by the counter numbers. The vote shall be verified by another election judge or counting board member.

In machine polling places, write-in votes shall be counted and the results tallied by the election judges or counting board after the regular ballots are counted.

After the vote has been tallied from a voting machine and before the official count is certified, the judges of election shall subtract any vote recorded on a machine when the machine was inspected prior to opening the polls.

This section does not vitiate the provisions of W.S.

22-9-125

permitting an alternate procedure for counting absentee ballots or the provisions of W.S. 22-14-114(b) permitting the counting of ballots at a central counting center.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-206; Laws 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2019 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “precinct” and made similar changes in (a), (b) and (d).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in (f), added "or the provisions of W.S. 22-14-114(b) permitting the counting of ballots at a central counting center" at the end.

§ 22-14-106.
Certifying information in pollbooks; form. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-207; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; repealed by 2015 ch. 138, § 2, effective March 4, 2015.

§ 22-14-107.
Tabulation of count.

The unofficial tabulation indicating the vote by precinct shall immediately be transmitted by the county clerk to the secretary of state. These unofficial tabulations shall be tabulated by the secretary of the state. The secretary of state shall provide procedures for such transmittal through rule and regulation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-208; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 39, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the last sentence.

§§ 22-14-108 and 22-14-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to printout sheets and release of unofficial results.

§ 22-14-110.
Sealing paper ballots and voting machine records.

Paper ballots shall be sealed by the election judges in an envelope after being counted and tallied, unless the ballots are being counted at a central counting center as authorized by W.S. 22-14-114(b). One (1) copy of each voting machine record shall be sealed in a separate envelope showing the district, precinct and machine number and endorsed by the election judges. These envelopes shall then be sealed in a single large container. The district and precinct number shall be written on each container.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-211; Laws 1979, ch. 133,§ 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2019 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added "unless the ballots are being counted at a central counting center as authorized by W.S. 22-14-114(b)" at the end of the first sentence.

§ 22-14-111.
Returning records and returns to clerk.

Unless the votes are being counted at a central counting center as authorized by W.S. 22-14-114(b), election judges shall, as soon as possible after the tabulation of votes is complete, return by messenger to the clerk who prepared the ballots for the election the following records and returns in a sealed packet:

One (1) sealed copy from each electronic voting system printer pack;

All ballots cast, including provisional ballots;

Spoiled or rejected ballots;

Ballots not cast;

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 3.

Affidavits, registration application forms and oaths where required;

Tally sheets;

Oaths of judges of election;

Reconciliation of ballots;

Tally sheet if ballots are hand counted.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-212; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, §§ 2, 3; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2019 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “One (1) sealed copy” for “One (1) copy of the sealed pollbook with one (1) sealed copy”; and added (a)(viii) through (a)(x).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in (a), added "Unless the votes are being counted at a central counting center as authorized by W.S. 22-14-114(b), election judges shall" and deleted "election judges shall" preceding "return by messenger."

Cross references. —

For form of oath of challenged voters, see §

22-15-105

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-14-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to preserving ballots.

§ 22-14-113.
Return of voting machine keys and supplies.

Keys to voting machines shall be returned to the county clerk in an envelope sealed and signed by an election judge and endorsed by an election judge of a different political party affiliation. On this envelope shall be recorded the number of the seal with which the machine was closed.

All voting supplies, ballot boxes and voting machines shall be returned to the county clerk as soon as possible after the vote has been returned.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-214; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-14-114.
Counting of ballots.

For ballots designed to be counted by machine, each individual vote shall be determined by the voting equipment and shall not be determined subjectively by human tabulation except when the intent of the voter is unmistakable but the ballot was received in such damaged, soiled, or other condition that it is rejected by the machine. The secretary of state may promulgate rules establishing standards for counting such ballots. For ballots not designed to be counted by machine, only votes clearly marked, as provided by W.S.

22-14-104

and rules promulgated pursuant to this code, shall be tallied. For write-in votes, names which are misspelled or abbreviated or the use of nicknames of candidates shall be counted for the candidate if the vote is obvious to the board.

At the request of a county clerk, ballots may be received from a polling place and counted at a central counting center in accordance with rules promulgated by the secretary of state pursuant to W.S. 22-2-121(g).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 1; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2019 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment

added the exception at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); and added (b).